Missouri, session 2026, SB1179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 142, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 142.1050, to read as
follows:
142.1050. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, any tax, excise, license, or fee upon, measured by
or with respect to the importation, receipt, manufacture,
storage, transportation, sale, or use of fuel used for
propelling motor vehicles authorized by a political
subdivision shall expire five years after enactment unless
reauthorized by a two-thirds majority vote of the people of
the political subdivision.
✓